Maryland, session 2025, HB0846.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
2–1302.1.
After making the distributions required under §§ 2–1301 and 2–1302 of this subtitle:
(1) of the sales and use tax collected under § 11–104(c) and (c–1) of this
article on short–term vehicle rentals and peer–to–peer car sharing, the Comptroller shall
distribute:
(i) 45% to the Transportation Trust Fund established under § 3–216
of the Transportation Article; and
(ii) the remainder to the Chesapeake and Atlantic Coastal Bays 2010
Trust Fund; [and]
(2) the Comptroller shall distribute to the Transportation Trust Fund
established under § 3–216 of the Transportation Article the sales and use tax collected that
is attributable to the sale of electricity:
(i) at an electric vehicle charging station; or
(ii) used to charge an electric vehicle and is not sold under a
residential or domestic rate schedule on file with the Public Service Commission; AND
(3) THE COMPTROLLER SHALL DISTRIBUTE TO THE
TRANSPORTATION TRUST FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 3–216 OF THE
TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE THE SALES AND USE TAX COLLECTED THAT IS
ATTRIBUTABLE TO TRANSPORTATION–RELATED SERVICES UNDER § 11–101(M)(14)
OF THIS ARTICLE.

HOUSE BILL 846 3
11–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(C–12) “NAICS” MEANS THE NORTH AMERICAN INDUSTRIAL
CLASSIFICATION SYSTEM, UNITED STATES MANUAL, 2022 EDITION, PUBLISHED BY
THE UNITED STATES OFFICE OF MANAGEMENT AND BUDGET.
[(c–12)] (C–13) “Permanent” means perpetual or for an indefinite or unspecified
length of time.
(l) (1) “Taxable price” means the value, in money, of the consideration of any
kind that is paid, delivered, payable, or deliverable by a buyer to a vendor in the
consummation and complete performance of a sale without deduction for any expense or
cost, including the cost of:
(i) any labor or service rendered;
(ii) any material used; or
(iii) any property, digital code, or digital product sold.
(3) “Taxable price” does not include:
(i) a charge that is made in connection with a sale and is stated as
a separate item of the consideration for:
1. a delivery, freight, or other transportation service for
delivery directly to the buyer by the vendor or by another person acting for the vendor,
unless the transportation service is a taxable service;
2. a finance charge, interest, or similar charge for credit
extended to the buyer;
3. a labor or service for application or installation UNLESS
THE LABOR OR SERVICE IS A TAXABLE SERVICE;
4. a mandatory gratuity or service charge in the nature of a
tip for serving food or beverage to a group of 10 or fewer individuals for consumption on the
premises of the vendor;
5. a professional service UNLESS THE SERVICE IS A
TAXABLE SERVICE;
6. a tax:

HOUSE BILL 846
A. imposed by a county on the sale of coal, electricity, oil,
nuclear fuel assemblies, steam, or artificial or natural gas;
B. imposed under § 3–302(a) of the Natural Resources
Article, as a surcharge on electricity, and added to an electric bill;
C. imposed under §§ 6–201 through 6–203 of the
Tax – Property Article, on tangible personal property subject to a lease that is for an initial
period that exceeds 1 year and is noncancellable except for cause; or
D. imposed under § 4–102 of this article on the gross receipts
derived from an admissions and amusement charge;
7. any service for the operation of equipment used for the
production of audio, video, or film recordings; or
8. reimbursement of incidental expenses paid to a third party
and incurred in connection with providing a taxable detective service;
(ii) the value of a used component or part (core value) received from
a purchaser of the following remanufactured truck parts:
1. an air brake system;
2. an engine;
3. a rear axle carrier; or
4. a transmission;
(iii) a charge for a nontaxable service that is made in connection with
a sale of a taxable communication service, even if the nontaxable charges are aggregated
with and not separately stated from the taxable charges for communications services, if the
vendor can reasonably identify charges not subject to tax from its books and records that
are kept in the regular course of business; or
(iv) a transportation network company impact fee imposed under §
10–408 of the Public Utilities Article.
(m) “Taxable service” means:
(12) a prepaid telephone calling arrangement; [or]
(13) the privilege given to an individual under § 4–1102 of the Alcoholic
Beverages and Cannabis Article to consume wine that is not purchased from or provided
by a restaurant, club, or hotel; OR

HOUSE BILL 846 5
(14) THE FOLLOWING TRANSPORTATION–RELATED SERVICES:
(I) A TRANSPORTATION EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURING
SERVICE (NAICS SECTOR 336);
(II) A SERVICE PROVIDED BY A TRANSPORTATION EQUIPMENT
AND SUPPLIES (EXCEPT MOTOR VEHICLE) MERCHANT WHOLESALER (NAICS
SECTOR 42386);
(III) A CONSTRUCTION, TRANSPORTATION, MINING, AND
FORESTRY MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT RENTAL AND LEASING SERVICE (NAICS
SECTOR 53241);
(IV) AN AIR TRANSPORTATION SERVICE (NAICS SECTOR 481);
(V) A LIMOUSINE SERVICE (NAICS SECTOR 485320);
(VI) A MOTOR VEHICLE TOWING SERVICE (NAICS SECTOR
488410);
(VII) A COURIER AND MESSENGER SERVICE (NAICS SECTOR
492);
(VIII) AN AUTOMOTIVE REPAIR AND MAINTENANCE SERVICE
(NAICS SECTOR 8111);
(IX) A SERVICE RELATED TO THE OPERATION OF A PARKING LOT
OR GARAGE (NAICS SECTOR 812930); OR
(X) A REGULATION AND ADMINISTRATION OF
TRANSPORTATION PROGRAMS SERVICE (NAICS SECTOR 92612).
Article – Transportation
3–215.
(a) (1) For the purpose of paying the principal of and interest on consolidated
transportation bonds as they become due and payable, there is hereby levied and imposed
an annual tax that consists of the taxes specified in this section and, to the extent necessary
and except as otherwise provided in this subsection, that shall be used and applied
exclusively for that purpose.
(2) The required use and application of the tax under paragraph (1) of this
subsection is subject only to the prior use and application of one or all or any combination

HOUSE BILL 846
of the taxes specified in this section to meet the debt service on all of the following bonds
while they are outstanding and unpaid and to the payment of which any part of those taxes
has been pledged:
(i) Bonds of prior issues; and
(ii) Bonds of any series of county transportation bonds issued under
Subtitle 3 of this title.
(b) The tax levied and imposed by this section consists of that part of the following
taxes that are retained to the credit of the Department after distributions to the political
subdivisions:
(1) The motor fuel tax revenue distributed under §§ 2–1103(2), 2–1103(3),
and 2–1104(a)(3) of the Tax – General Article;
(2) The motor fuel tax revenue attributable to the sales and use tax
equivalent rate imposed under § 9–306 of the Tax – General Article and distributed under
§ 2–1103(4) of the Tax – General Article;
(3) The income tax revenue distributed under § 2–614 of the Tax – General
Article;
(4) The excise tax imposed on vehicles by Part II of Title 13, Subtitle 8 of
this article;
(5) The sales and use tax revenues distributed under § 2–1302.1 of the Tax
– General Article; and
(6) The transportation network company impact fee revenues allocated
under § 3–216(d)(5)(i)1 of this subtitle.
8–402.
(a) There is a Gasoline and Motor Vehicle Revenue Account in the Transportation
Trust Fund.
(b) (1) All revenues collected from the following, after deductions provided by
law, shall be credited to the Gasoline and Motor Vehicle Revenue Account:
[(1)] (I) All of the motor vehicle fuel tax;
[(2)] (II) Except as otherwise provided by law, two–thirds of the vehicle
titling tax;
[(3)] (III) Except for revenues collected under Title 13, Subtitle 9, Parts III
and IV of this article, vehicle registration fees;

HOUSE BILL 846 7
[(4)] (IV) The revenue disbursed to this Account under § 2–614 of the Tax
– General Article; and
[(5)] (V) 80% of the funds distributed on short–term vehicle rentals under
§ 2–1302.1 of the Tax – General Article to the Transportation Trust Fund from the sales
and use tax.
(2) THE SALES AND USE TAX REVENUE THAT IS ATTRIBUTABLE TO A
TRANSPORTATION–RELATED SERVICE AND DISTRIBUTED TO THE TRANSPORTATION
TRUST FUND UNDER § 2–1302.1 OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE MAY NOT BE
CREDITED TO THE GASOLINE AND MOTOR VEHICLE REVENUE ACCOUNT.
(c) For fiscal year 2020 and each fiscal year thereafter, revenue credited to the
Account shall be used as provided in § 3–216 of this article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.